Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-703. Future rates — Maintenance of separate accounts.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall maintain a separate account for each employer and shall credit the employer's account with all the contributions paid on the employer's own behalf except as otherwise provided in §§ 11-10-701 — 11-10-715.

However, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to grant any employer or individuals in the employer's service prior claims or rights to the amounts paid by the employer into the fund either on the employer's behalf or on behalf of such individuals.

Regular benefits paid to an eligible individual based on an initial claim shall be charged to the separate account of each employer in the base period in the proportion to which wages paid by each employer to the individual during the base period bears to total wages paid by all such employers to such individual within the base period.

However, regular benefits paid to an eligible individual after the individual has established a benefit year against a base-period employer under qualifying conditions and whose employment continued with the employer but who subsequently left the employment under conditions that would have been a noncharge under subdivisions (a)(3) and (4) of this section shall be charged through the date on which the subsequent separation occurred to the separate account of the base-period employer.

Benefits paid from the established benefit year to an individual after the date on which the subsequent separation occurred shall not be charged to the separate account of the base-period employer.

Nothing in §§ 11-10-701 — 11-10-715 shall be construed to limit regular benefits payable pursuant to §§ 11-10-501 — 11-10-506 and 11-10-609 — 11-10-613.

However, regular benefit payments shall not be charged to the separate account of any employer if the employer provides the director with notices regarding separation from work as are required by rules of the director if the director finds that:

The claimant voluntarily left the employer without good cause connected with the work; or

The claimant was discharged by the employer for misconduct connected with the work.

Benefits paid to an individual who continues to remain in the employ of a base-period employer without a reduction in the number of hours worked or wages paid shall not be charged to the separate account of the employer, provided that the individual is not employed on an as-needed or on-call basis.

Benefits paid during an extended benefit period in accordance with §§ 11-10-534 — 11-10-543 shall not be charged to the separate account of each employer in the base period except as may otherwise be provided in §§ 11-10-701 — 11-10-715.

Relief from charges shall not be granted if:

An overpayment of benefits is the result of a failure by an employer or the employer's agent to respond timely or adequately to a request for information from the Division of Workforce Services; and

The employer or the employer's agent has established a pattern of failing to respond to such requests.

Benefit payments made to any individual whose base-period wages include wages for previously uncovered services as defined in § 11-10-507(5)(C) shall not be charged to the separate account of any employer to the extent that the Unemployment Compensation Fund is reimbursed for the benefits pursuant to section 121 of Pub. L. No. 94-566.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1949, No. 155, § 8; 1953, No. 162, § 11; 1955, No. 395, § 21; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, §§ 11-13; 1973, No. 350, §§ 2, 3; 1975, No. 609, § 6; 1977, No. 376, § 12; 1981, No. 43, § 11; 1983, No. 482, § 26; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; Acts 1995, No. 519, § 8; 1997, No. 234, § 22; 2007, No. 490, § 10; 2013, No. 956, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 828; 2019, No. 910, §§
284, 285.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7, as amended, provided in part that:

“For rate years beginning prior to January 1, 1984:

If on the computation date, the total of all his contributions paid, excluding a payment which represents a stabilization tax payment or a payment which represents an extended benefit tax payment, on his own behalf for all previous periods equals or exceeds the total regular benefits charged to his account for all such previous periods, the contribution rate of an employer who has been subject to three or more years of benefit risk for the ensuing rate year, except as provided in subdivision (c)(3)(III) of this section, shall be that shown on the corresponding line which reflects his reserve ratio in schedule A which follows. The reserve ratio in this schedule is determined by dividing the excess of contributions paid over regular benefits charged by the annual taxable payroll.

SCHEDULE A CONTRIBUTION
RATE RESERVE RATIO
2.7% 0.0% but less than 4.0%
2.5% 4.0% but less than 4.5%
2.3% 4.5% but less than 5.0%
2.1% 5.0% but less than 5.5%
1.9% 5.5% but less than 6.0%
1.7% 6.0% but less than 6.5%
1.5% 6.5% but less than 7.0%
1.3% 7.0% but less than 7.5%
1.1% 7.5% but less than 8.0%
0.9% 8.0% but less than 8.5%
0.7% 8.5% but less than 9.0%
0.5% 9.0% but less than 9.5%
0.3% 9.5% but less than 10.0%
0.1% 10.0% or more

Click to view SCHEDULE A

“Notwithstanding any other provision of this law, if, on the computation date, the total of all contributions paid on an employer's own behalf and credited to his account for all previous periods is less than the regular benefits charged to his account for all such previous periods, his contribution rate shall be five percent (5%) for rate years beginning on and after January 1, 1981, except that,

“If on the computation dates for the current rate year and immediately preceding rate year, the total of all contributions paid on an employer's own behalf and credited to his account for all previous periods is less than the total regular benefits charged to his account for all such previous periods, his contribution rate shall be five and five-tenths percent (5.5%) for rate years beginning on and after January 1, 1982, except that,

“If on the computation dates for the current rate year and the two (2) immediately preceding rate years, the total of all contributions paid on an employer's own behalf and credited to his account for all previous periods is less than the total regular benefits charged to his account for all such previous periods, his contribution rate shall be six percent (6%) for rate years beginning on and after January 1, 1983.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (a)(6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the introductory language of (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1)(A); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(6)(A).

U.S. Code.

Section 121 of Pub. L. 94-566 is codified as a note under 26 U.S.C. § 3304.

11-10-704. Future rates — Experience rates generally.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall, for each calendar year, classify employers in accordance with their actual experience in the payment of contributions on their own behalf and with respect to regular benefits charged against their accounts, with a view to fixing the contribution rates as will reflect their experience.

The director shall determine the contribution rates of each employer in accordance with the requirements of this section and § 11-10-705:

Each employer's rate shall be two and nine-tenths percent (2.9%) except as otherwise provided in the other provisions of this subchapter.

No employer's rate shall be less than two and nine-tenths percent (2.9%) unless and until there shall have been three (3) years immediately preceding the computation date throughout which an individual the employer's employ could have received benefits if eligible. Provided, however, an employer who, at the time of establishing an account, is in business in another state or states and who is not currently doing business in Arkansas may elect to receive a beginning contribution rate of two and nine-tenths percent (2.9%) or a contribution rate based on the rate schedule at § 11-10-705(b)(1), whichever is lower, but in no event less than one percent (1%), provided:

The employer has been in operation in the other state or states for at least three (3) years immediately preceding the date of becoming a liable employer in Arkansas, throughout which an individual in the employer's employ could have received benefits if eligible;

The employer must provide the authenticated account history from information accumulated from operations in the other state or all the other states to compute a current Arkansas rate; and

The employer's business operations established in Arkansas are of the same nature as conducted in the other state or states, as defined by the North American Industry Classification System.

The election authorized in subdivision (b)(1)(A)(i) of this section must be made in writing within thirty (30) days after receiving notice of Arkansas liability. A two-and-nine-tenths-percent rate will be assigned unless a timely election has been made.

If the election is made timely, the employer's account will receive the rate elected for the remainder of that rate year. The rate assigned for the next and subsequent years will be determined by the condition of the account on the computation date.

However, any employer having no covered employment under this chapter for any calendar year shall have a rate equal to his or her most recently determined contribution rate until the employer has one (1) full year of benefit risk experience immediately preceding the computation date.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of §§ 11-10-701 — 11-10-715, if the director determines that an employer has willfully submitted false information which is material with respect to the employment or separation from employment of any claimant, employee, or former employee, for the purpose of preventing regular benefit charges to the employer's account, the employer shall be assessed a penalty equivalent to twice the amount of the claimant's maximum potential benefit amount.

This charge shall be charged against the employer's account for experience rating purposes, regardless of whether or not the employer is a base-period employer and irrespective of the identity or number of base-period employers.

An employer who changes from reimbursement to the contributory method of financing shall be considered a new or newly covered employer and can be entitled to an experience rate only when the new or newly covered employer has met the requirements of this subsection (b).

Each employer's rate beginning January 1 for each twelve-month period shall be determined on the basis of the employer's record through June 30 of the previous calendar year.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1943, No. 135, § 1; 1947, No. 398, § 6; 1955, No. 395, § 22; 1957, No. 133, § 1; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, § 11; 1973, No. 329, §§ 10, 11; 1973, No. 350, §§ 2, 3; 1975, No. 609, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; Acts 2001, No. 1528, § 1; 2005, No. 902, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 286.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-705. Future rates — Computation of contribution rates.

Each employer's contribution rate beginning January 1 for each twelve-month period shall be determined on the basis of the employer's record through June 30 of the previous calendar year.

The record of an employer shall include, for the purpose of computing an employer's contribution rate, any payment, except a payment that represents a stabilization tax payment or a payment that represents an extended benefit tax payment, made by the employer on or before July 31 on wages paid by the employer on or before June 30 of the calendar year.

The contribution rate of an employer who has had three (3) or more years of benefit risk as defined at § 11-10-707 shall be that shown on the corresponding line that reflects the employer's reserve ratio in the contribution rate schedule which follows.

The reserve ratio in the following schedule is determined by dividing the difference in contributions paid and regular benefits charged by the annual taxable payroll:

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for any calendar year beginning on and after January 1, 2008, an employer that has been assigned a contribution rate of six percent (6%) under this chapter and that has had such a rate for the two (2) preceding calendar years will be assigned an additional contribution assessment of two percent (2%).

After two (2) consecutive years of being assessed an additional contribution of two percent (2%) under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, this additional contribution assessment shall increase to four percent (4%).

For calendar years beginning January 1, 2014, and thereafter, after two (2) consecutive years of being assessed an additional contribution of four percent (4%) under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section, the additional contribution assessment shall increase to six percent (6%).

For calendar years beginning January 1, 2014, and thereafter, after two (2) consecutive years of being assessed an additional contribution of six percent (6%) under subdivision (b)(2)(C) of this section, the additional contribution assessment shall increase to eight percent (8%).

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter and unless prohibited by § 11-10-723(c)(1), an employer that has been assigned a contribution rate pursuant to this chapter may make a voluntary payment to the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund Account, in addition to the contributions required pursuant to this chapter, to be credited to the employer's account.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall provide to each eligible employer an annual notice of voluntary payment amounts that may be submitted to reduce the employer's contribution rate.

Voluntary payments to the fund account under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be made no later than March 31 of the calendar year for which the new contribution rate is effective.

Upon receipt of a timely voluntary payment, the director shall compute a new contribution rate for the employer and provide notice to the employer of the new contribution rate.

Any adjustments made under §§ 11-10-703 — 11-10-708 shall be used only in the form of credit against accrued or future contributions.

No refund shall ever be made to any employer of any voluntary payment so made.

CONTRIBUTION
RESERVE RATIO RATE
0.1% 9.95% or more
0.3% 9.35% but less than 9.95%
0.5% 8.85% but less than 9.35%
0.8% 8.65% but less than 8.85%
1.2% 8.35% but less than 8.65%
1.6% 7.95% but less than 8.35%
2.0% 7.35% but less than 7.95%
2.4% 6.75% but less than 7.35%
2.8% 5.45% but less than 6.75%
3.2% 2.45% but less than 5.45%
4.0% 1.35% but less than 2.45%
5.0% Less than 1.35% with a positive
reserve balance
6.0% Less than 0.00%

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1947, No. 398, § 6; 1949, No. 155, § 10; 1953, No. 162, § 12; 1955, No. 395, § 23; 1959, No. 142, § 1A; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, §§ 11-13; 1981, No. 43, § 12; 1983, No. 482, § 27; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; Acts 1989, No. 420, §§ 8, 9; 1991, No. 48, § 7; 1997, No. 234, § 23; 1999, No. 1055, § 1; 2001, No. 964, § 1; 2001, No. 1367, § 9; 2005, No. 902, § 9; 2007, No. 490, § 11; 2013, No. 1191, § 1; 2015, No. 1153, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 287.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7, as amended, provided in part that:

“For rate years beginning prior to January 1, 1984:

If on the computation date, the total of all his contributions paid, excluding a payment which represents a stabilization tax payment or a payment which represents an extended benefit tax payment, on his own behalf for all previous periods equals or exceeds the total regular benefits charged to his account for all such previous periods, the contribution rate of an employer who has been subject to three or more years of benefit risk for the ensuing rate year, except as provided in subdivision (c)(3)(III) of this section, shall be that shown on the corresponding line which reflects his reserve ratio in schedule A which follows. The reserve ratio in this schedule is determined by dividing the excess of contributions paid over regular benefits charged by the annual taxable payroll.

SCHEDULE A CONTRIBUTION
RATE RESERVE RATIO
2.7% 0.0% but less than 4.0%
2.5% 4.0% but less than 4.5%
2.3% 4.5% but less than 5.0%
2.1% 5.0% but less than 5.5%
1.9% 5.5% but less than 6.0%
1.7% 6.0% but less than 6.5%
1.5% 6.5% but less than 7.0%
1.3% 7.0% but less than 7.5%
1.1% 7.5% but less than 8.0%
0.9% 8.0% but less than 8.5%
0.7% 8.5% but less than 9.0%
0.5% 9.0% but less than 9.5%
0.3% 9.5% but less than 10.0%
0.1%
10.0% or more

Click to view SCHEDULE A

“Notwithstanding any other provision of this law, if, on the computation date, the total of all contributions paid on an employer's own behalf and credited to his account for all previous periods is less than the regular benefits charged to his account for all such previous periods, his contribution rate shall be five percent (5%) for rate years beginning on and after January 1, 1981, except that,

“If on the computation dates for the current rate year and immediately preceding rate year, the total of all contributions paid on an employer's own behalf and credited to his account for all previous periods is less than the total regular benefits charged to his account for all such previous periods, his contribution rate shall be five and five-tenths percent (5.5%) for rate years beginning on and after January 1, 1982, except that,

“If on the computation dates for the current rate year and the two (2) immediately preceding rate years, the total of all contributions paid on an employer's own behalf and credited to his account for all previous periods is less than the total regular benefits charged to his account for all such previous periods, his contribution rate shall be six percent (6%) for rate years beginning on and after January 1, 1983.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (b)(2)(C) and (b)(2)(D).

The 2015 amendment substituted “under” for “pursuant to” in (b)(2)(A); substituted “After” for “Furthermore, after” in (b)(2)(B); and substituted “For” for “Furthermore, for” in (b)(2)(C) and (b)(2)(D).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (c)(1)(B).

11-10-706. Future rates — Stabilization tax.

Each employer shall be required to pay a stabilization tax on wages paid by the employer with respect to employment.

This stabilization tax shall not be credited to the separate account of each employer.

The stabilization tax shall be determined as follows:

If the assets of the Unemployment Compensation Fund on the computation date are equal to or greater than two percent (2%) but less than two and one-half percent (2.5%) of total payrolls for employment during the preceding calendar year, the stabilization tax shall be one-tenth of one percent (0.1%);

If the assets of the Unemployment Compensation Fund on the computation date are greater than one and one-half percent (1.5%) but less than two percent (2%) of total payrolls for employment during the preceding calendar year, the stabilization tax shall be two-tenths of one percent (0.2%);

If the assets of the Unemployment Compensation Fund on the computation date are greater than one percent (1%) but less than one and one-half percent (1.5%) of total payrolls for employment during the preceding calendar year, the stabilization tax shall be three-tenths of one percent (0.3%);

If the assets of the Unemployment Compensation Fund on the computation date are greater than one-half of one percent (0.5%) but less than one percent (1%) of total payrolls for employment during the preceding calendar year, the stabilization tax shall be four-tenths of one percent (0.4%);

If the assets of the Unemployment Compensation Fund on the computation date are less than one-half of one percent (0.5%) of total payrolls for employment during the preceding calendar year, the stabilization tax shall be seven-tenths of one percent (0.7%); and

If the assets of the Unemployment Compensation Fund on the computation date are less than four-tenths of one percent (0.4%) of total payrolls for employment during the preceding calendar year, the stabilization tax shall be one and one-tenth percent (1.1%) for the calendar year 1993, nine-tenths of one percent (0.9%) for the calendar year 1994, and eight-tenths of one percent (0.8%) for the calendar year 1995 and thereafter.

Each employer eligible for an experience rating under § 11-10-705 shall have the employer's contribution rate reduced by one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) for any rate year when the assets of the Unemployment Compensation Fund on the computation date are greater than five percent (5%) of total payrolls for employment during the preceding calendar year.

Employers who have elected to reimburse the Unemployment Compensation Fund in lieu of contributions under § 11-10-404 or § 11-10-713 shall be excluded from the provisions of §§ 11-10-703 — 11-10-708 or any experience rate computation.

The provisions of this section shall not be effective for any rate year when the assets of the Unemployment Compensation Fund, excluding contributions not yet paid, on the computation date equal or exceed two and one-half percent (2.5%) but are less than five percent (5%) of total payrolls for employment during the preceding calendar year.

For the purposes of §§ 11-10-703 — 11-10-708, total payrolls shall exclude payrolls of employers who have elected to reimburse the Unemployment Compensation Fund in lieu of contributions under § 11-10-404 or § 11-10-713.

For the purposes of §§ 11-10-703 — 11-10-708, the assets of the Unemployment Compensation Fund as of the computation date shall include only contributions which were paid on or before June 30, the computation date.

Provided, however, for the purposes of this section, the computation date is defined as September 30 of the calendar year preceding the tax year.

It shall include any accounts receivable from the United States for its share of extended benefit payments which have been paid from the Unemployment Compensation Fund and any accounts receivable from employers who have elected to reimburse the Unemployment Compensation Fund for benefits paid under § 11-10-404 or § 11-10-713.

However, it shall exclude the assets of the Unemployment Compensation Fund Extended Benefits Account and shall be reduced by any outstanding advances owed to the United States Government.

However, the proceeds of the stabilization tax in the amount of two and one-half hundredths of one percent (0.025%) of taxable wages collected during the period July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2023, shall be deposited and credited to the Division of Workforce Services Training Trust Fund, there to be used for worker training.

The total amount deposited into the Division of Workforce Services Training Trust Fund in any one (1) fiscal year shall not exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000).

However, the proceeds of the stabilization tax in the amount of two and one-half hundredths of one percent (0.025%) of taxable wages collected during the period July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2023, shall be deposited and credited to the Division of Workforce Services Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund, there to be used for personal services and operating expenses of the unemployment insurance program necessary for the proper administration of the Division of Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et seq., as determined by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.

The total amount deposited into the Division of Workforce Services Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund in any one (1) fiscal year shall not exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000).

If the amount deposited into the Division of Workforce Services Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund under subdivision (f)(2)(B)(i) of this section is not sufficient to meet the administrative needs under the Division of Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et seq., the Division of Workforce Services may deposit up to an additional three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) in any one (1) fiscal year to the Division of Workforce Services Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund upon approval by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

The director shall report to the Legislative Council on a quarterly basis as to any and all uses of the Division of Workforce Services Training Trust Fund and the Division of Workforce Services Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, § 12; 1973, No. 329, §§ 10, 11; 1975, No. 609, § 6; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1083, § 8; 1981, No. 43, §§ 11-13; 1983, No. 482, § 27; 1985, No. 8, § 8; 1985, No. 9, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; reen. Acts 1987, No. 672, § 7; Acts 1989, No. 420, § 10; 1991, No. 48, § 8; 1993, No. 6, §§ 13, 14; 1997, No. 234, § 24; 2001, No. 1628, § 1; 2007, No. 551, § 3; 2011, No. 1040, § 4; 2015, No. 690, §§
4, 5; 2015, No. 892, §§ 2, 3; 2017, No. 540, § 11; 2017, No. 1038, § 1; 2019, No. 454, §§ 1, 2;
2019, No. 910, § 288.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 672, § 7. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Acts 2015, No. 892, § 1, provided:

“Findings. The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Occupational, technical, and industrial training provides unique opportunities to improve the lives of Arkansans while advancing the state's economic development;

“(2)

Businesses seeking to begin operations in Arkansas look to the level of education and skills in the workforce as a key factor in making
investment decisions;

“(3)

Currently, Arkansas workforce education proceeds in a variety of agencies, without coordination, often with significant inefficiencies arising from overlapping and repeated programming and from important programs being overlooked as presumably covered by another program; and

“(4)

Bringing coordination of all state and federal career education and workforce development programs will:

“(A)

Reduce duplication of programming;

“(B)

Ensure that every Arkansan who seeks occupational, technical, and industrial training will find an appropriate education program in this state;

“(C)

Bring consistency and efficiency to the state's career education and workforce development efforts; and

“(D)

Alert industry to the commitment of the State of Arkansas to economic development through career education and workforce education.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “2015” for “2011” in (f)(1)(A) and (f)(2)(A).

The 2015 amendments by Nos. 690 and 892 deleted “Provided” at the beginning of (f)(1)(A); and substituted “June 30, 2019” for “June 30, 2015” in (f)(1)(A) and (f)(2)(A).

The 2017 amendment by No. 540 deleted “the State Employment Security Advisory Council and” preceding “the Legislative Council” in (f)(3).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1038 inserted “personal services and” in (f)(2)(A); redesignated former (f)(2)(B) as (f)(2)(B)(i); and added (f)(2)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 454 substituted “June 30, 2023” for “June 30, 2019” in (f)(1)(A) and (f)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” throughout (f).

11-10-707. Future rates — Definitions — Notifications.

As used in §§ 11-10-701 — 11-10-715:

The term “annual payroll” means the total amount of taxable wages paid during a calendar year by an employer for employment and for the employer who has had three (3) or more years of benefit risk experience; and

The term “average annual payroll” means the average of the annual payrolls for the last three (3) or the five (5) preceding calendar years, whichever is the lesser.

However, with respect to rate years beginning January 1, 1972, and thereafter, an employer who has been subject to three (3) or more years of benefit risk may voluntarily elect to be rated each year on the basis of total taxable wages paid during the preceding calendar year instead of the average of the annual payrolls for the last three (3) or last five (5) preceding calendar years, whichever is the lesser.

A voluntary election by an employer shall be made at the time and in the manner prescribed by rules of the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.

Any voluntary election so made shall be irrevocable, except with respect to an employer who acquires the experience of the electing employer under the provision of § 11-10-710.

The director shall for each rate year:

Periodically notify each employer of the regular benefits paid that are chargeable to the employer's account.

The notification shall become conclusive and binding upon the employer unless within thirty (30) days after mailing of the notice the employer files an application for review and redetermination as provided in subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

With the exception of charges that might be changed under § 11-10-703(a)(2)(A)(ii), an application for review and redetermination shall be made the first time that charges appear on the employer's account as reflected on the quarterly statement of paid benefits.

Subsequent charges on the same claimant in the same benefit year may not be challenged; and

Notify each employer of the employer's rate of contribution as determined pursuant to §§ 11-10-701 — 11-10-715.

The notice shall contain the contribution rate, and if the employer is eligible for an experience rating, the factors used in determining the individual employer's experience rate, together with any other information the director may think necessary.

The determination of the director, including all the figures shown on the notice or notices issued under this subdivision (c)(1), shall become conclusive and binding upon the employer unless within thirty (30) days after the mailing of the notice or notices thereof to the employer's last known post office address, the employer files an application for review and redetermination setting forth the employer's reasons therefor.

The director may, if he or she finds the reasons set forth by the employer insufficient to change the benefit charges to the employer's account or the rate of contributions, deny the application; otherwise, it shall be granted and the charges adjusted and the rate redetermined.

The employer shall be promptly notified by mailing to the employer's last known address the denial of the employer's application or of the redetermination, both of which shall become final and conclusive at the date of mailing of notification thereof.

An employer may appeal from the determination of the director to the circuit court by filing a petition with the clerk of the circuit court in the county of the employer's residence or in the Pulaski County Circuit Court within thirty (30) days of the mailing to the employer of notice of the determination.

As used in §§ 11-10-703 — 11-10-708, an employer's “year of benefit risk” means a twelve-month period ending on June 30 throughout which any individual in the employer's employ could have received benefits chargeable to the employer's account.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1943, No. 138, § 13; 1947, No. 398, § 6; 1949, No. 155, § 10; 1953, No. 162, § 13; 1955, No. 395, § 24; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, §§ 11-13; 1985, No. 8, § 9; 1985, No. 9, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; Acts 1989, No. 420, § 11; 1993, No. 6, § 15; 2001, No. 1367, § 10; 2007, No. 490, §§ 12, 13; 2019, No. 315, § 829; 2019, No. 910, §
289.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(2)(B).

11-10-708. Future rates — Advance interest tax.

In addition to the contributions and any stabilization and extended benefits taxes levied under other provisions of §§ 11-10-703 — 11-10-708, each employer, except employers that have made an election to reimburse the Unemployment Compensation Fund under § 11-10-713(c), shall pay a separate and additional tax, to be known as the advance interest tax, on wages paid by that employer with respect to employment.

For rate years beginning on and after January 1, 1993, the advance interest tax shall be two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) when the state has an outstanding interest-bearing advance under Title XII of the Social Security Act.

The tax is effective the first month of the quarter following the state's obtaining an interest-bearing advance and shall remain until the quarter immediately following the repayment of the advancement and the Employment Security Advance Interest Trust Fund, § 19-5-935, attains a balance of five million dollars ($5,000,000).

For purposes of this section, the definition of the assets of the trust fund shall be the same as that set forth in § 11-10-706, and the computation date is defined as September 30 of the calendar year preceding the tax year.

This advance interest tax shall not be credited to the separate account of any employer. It shall be levied and collected in the same manner as contributions and shall be subject to the same penalty and interest, collection, impoundment, priority, lien, certificate of assessment, and assessment provisions and procedures set forth in §§ 11-10-716 — 11-10-722.

Receipts from this advance interest tax and any penalty and interest collected on overdue advance interest taxes shall be deposited into the Unemployment Compensation Fund Clearing Account.

At least once each month, deposits that have been established as advance interest tax payments and any interest and penalty payments applicable to the advance interest payments shall be paid over to the Treasurer of State and credited by the Treasurer of State to the Employment Security Advance Interest Trust Fund created and established in the State Treasury.

All income from investment of the Employment Security Advance Interest Trust Fund shall be deposited and credited to that Employment Security Advance Interest Trust Fund.

All withdrawals shall be upon voucher warrants issued, or caused to be issued, by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services as authorized by legislative appropriation and, except as otherwise provided herein, shall be used only for the purpose of:

Paying interest incurred by the state on advances obtained from the federal Unemployment Trust Fund under Title XII of the Social Security Act;

Making refunds of the aforementioned advance interest tax and interest and penalty payments attributed to the advance interest tax which were erroneously paid; and

Returning moneys to the Unemployment Compensation Fund Clearing Account that may have been incorrectly identified and erroneously transferred to the Employment Security Advance Interest Trust Fund in the State Treasury.

On November 10 of each calendar year, the director shall transfer all assets of the Employment Security Advance Interest Trust Fund, which exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) to the Unemployment Compensation Fund, § 11-10-801, provided that the state has no interest-bearing advances obtained from the federal Unemployment Trust Fund under Title XII of the Social Security Act outstanding.

[Repealed.]

Any interest required to be paid on advances obtained by the state under Title XII of the Social Security Act shall be paid in a timely manner and shall not be paid directly or indirectly by an equivalent reduction in unemployment contributions or taxes imposed under other provisions of §§ 11-10-701 — 11-10-715 or otherwise from amounts in the Unemployment Compensation Fund established under § 11-10-801 et seq.

The director shall promulgate such rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, §§ 11-13; 1973, No. 329, §§ 10, 11; 1973, No. 350, §§ 2, 3; 1983, No. 482, § 29; 1985, No. 8, § 10; 1985, No. 9, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 42; 1993, No. 6, § 16; 1995, No. 519, § 9; 2019, No. 315, § 830; 2019, No. 910, §§
290, 291.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (b)(4); and repealed (c)(2).

U.S. Code.

Title XII of the Social Security Act is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 1321 et seq.

11-10-709. Wages and employment.

For the purposes of §§ 11-10-701 and 11-10-702, wages shall not include that part of remuneration paid to an individual by an employer or the employer's predecessor with respect to the employment during any calendar year which exceeds that part of remuneration paid specified in § 11-10-215(a)(1), unless that part of the remuneration is subject to a tax under a federal law imposing a tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment fund.

For the purposes of this section, the term “employment” shall include service constituting employment under any unemployment compensation law of another state.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, § 14; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1083, § 9; 1977, No. 366, § 9; 1981, No. 43, § 14; 1983, No. 482, § 30; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; reen. Acts 1987, No. 672, § 8; Acts 1989, No. 420, § 12.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 672, § 8. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.